Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201871-427.03
Remote dispensing pharmacy, defined.

Remote dispensing pharmacy means a pharmacy staffed by certified pharmacy technicians in Nebraska in which remote dispensing may occur.

Laws 2018, LB731, § 96.
July 19, 2018